Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.876

Dissenter's estimate of fair value—Notice.

(1) A dissenter may notify the limited partnership in writing of the dissenter's own estimate of the fair value of the dissenter's partnership interest and amount of interest due, and demand payment of the dissenter's estimate, less any payment under RCW 25.10.866; if:

(a) The dissenter believes that the amount paid is less than the fair value of the dissenter's partnership interest or that the interest due is incorrectly calculated;

(b) The limited partnership fails to make payment within sixty days after the date set for demanding payment; or

(c) The limited partnership, having failed to effectuate the proposed merger, does not release the transfer restrictions imposed on partnership interests as permitted by RCW 25.10.861 within sixty days after the date set for demanding payment.

(2) A dissenter waives the right to demand payment under this section unless the dissenter notifies the limited partnership of the dissenter's demand in writing under subsection (1)(a) of this section within thirty days after the limited partnership made payment for the dissenter's partnership interest.

[ 2009 c 188 s 1210.]